Vermont statutes. Title 2 Legislature
Chapter 30. Capitol Complex Security Advisory Committee

§ 991. Section 991 repealed effective June 30, 2023. Capitol Complex Security Advisory Committee.

Creation. There is created an advisory committee for the purpose of:

reviewing and coordinating security in the Capitol Complex; and

enhancing communication, operability, and efficiency on security issues in the Capitol Complex among the Executive, Legislative, and Judicial branches.

Membership.

The Committee shall be composed of the following members:

the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or designee;

the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;

the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee;

the Chief of the Capitol Police or designee;

the Chairs of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and of the Senate Committee on Institutions;

the Sergeant at Arms;

the Court Administrator or designee; and

the Chief of the Montpelier Police Department or designee.

In the first year, the Chair of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions shall serve as Chair of the Committee and the Chair of the Senate Committee on Institutions shall serve as Vice Chair. Annually thereafter, the offices of Chair and Vice Chair shall rotate between the Chairs of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and of the Senate Committee on Institutions.

The Committee shall have the assistance of the staff of the Office of Legislative Counsel and the Joint Fiscal Office.

Powers and duties. The Committee shall:

review proposed security enhancements and security plans for the Capitol Complex, and make recommendations to the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions;

review the coordination of security plans and law enforcement services in the Capitol Complex among the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, the Court Administrator, and the Sergeant at Arms; and

annually review the memorandum of understanding coordinating the provision of security plans and law enforcement activities in the Capitol Complex, as required by

29 V.S.A. § 171(f)

.

Meetings. The Committee may meet at any time at the call of the Co-Chairs, but no more than two times when the General Assembly is not in session.

Reimbursement. For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General Assembly, legislative members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to

2 V.S.A. § 23

.

Definition. As used in this section, “Capitol Complex” shall have the same meaning as in

29 V.S.A. § 182

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 2016; repealed on June 30, 2023 by

2021, No. 50

, § 23.